Hawaii statutes.
[§463E-15] Use of podiatrist; public
programs. Whenever medical or surgical services within the scope of
activities of a podiatrist licensed under this chapter are included in any
program financed by public funds or administered by any public agency for aid
to the indigent, the aged, the legally blind, or any other group or class, the
recipient of such aid shall be entitled to choose whether the services are to
be performed by a duly licensed physician or by a duly licensed podiatrist. [L
1973, c 80, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next